District of Columbia statutes.
34-2303

Opportunity for a tenant to receive service in own name; payment made by tenant.

(a)

If an owner of rental property or his or her agent is billed directly by the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (“Authority”) for water and sanitary sewer services provided to the rental property, and the owner or his or her agent fails to pay a delinquent account for the services, each tenant who resides in the affected property may receive water and sanitary sewer services in his or her own name without liability for the charges accrued while the services were billed directly to the owner of the rental property. A tenant shall receive water and sanitary sewer services in his or her own name only if it is deemed practicable by the Mayor in accordance with rules issued pursuant to § 34-2306.

(b)

Any payment made by a tenant of rental property pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed in lieu of an equal amount of rent and shall be deducted from any rent due and owing or to become due and owing to the owner, agent, lessor, or manager of the rental property.

(c)

Nothing in this section shall prevent the Mayor from pursuing any other appropriate action or remedy at law or equity against an owner, agent, lessor, manager, or tenant of a rental property.

History

May 18, 1954, ch. 218, title XVIII, § 1803
as added June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-136, § 2(g), 37 DCR 2620
Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-183, § 3(a), 47 DCR 7062

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1653.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-183 substituted in subsec. (a) “the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (’Authority’)” for “Department of Public Works (’Department’)”.